Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3045.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-5 of the General Laws entitled "Search Warrants" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
12-5-11. Warrant for a tracking device.
(a) For purposes of this section, a "tracking device" means an electronic or mechanical
device which permits the tracking or the movement of a person or object.
(b) A warrant for the installation and use of a tracking device shall state the date and times
of its issuance and the grounds for probable cause for its issuance and shall command the law
enforcement officer to complete the installation of the device within a specific period not later than
ten (10) days after the date of its issuance. The warrant for a tracking device shall identify the
person or property to be tracked and specify a reasonable length of time that the device may be
installed. The time shall not exceed fifteen (15) days from the date the warrant was issued. The
court may, for good cause, grant one or more extensions for a reasonable period not to exceed
fifteen (15) days each.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005023
========